Utah statutes.
54-7-5.   Orders and certificates to be in writing and entered on records of commission -- Recordation.

Every order, authorization or certificate issued or approved by the commission under any provision of this title shall be in writing and entered on the records of the commission. Any such order, authorization or certificate, or a copy thereof or a copy of the record of any such order, authorization or certificate certified by a commissioner or by the secretary or the assistant secretary under the official seal of the commission to be a true copy of the original, may be recorded in the office of the recorder of any county in which is located the principal place of business of any public utility affected thereby or in which is situated any property of any such public utility, and such record shall impart notice of its provisions to all persons. A certificate under the seal of the commission that any such order, authorization or certificate has not been modified, stayed, suspended or revoked may also be recorded in the same manner and with like effect.

